Maine, session 132, LD548.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
CONCEPT DRAFT
SUMMARY
This bill is a concept draft pursuant to Joint Rule 208.
This bill proposes to amend the laws governing hemp to establish a mechanism for the
State to regulate the sale of intoxicating hemp products. The bill would require that
intoxicating hemp products sold in the State be produced by a licensed adult use cannabis
products manufacturing facility and sold within the State at licensed adult use cannabis
stores. The bill would define intoxicating hemp products as hemp-derived inhalable or
consumable products containing one or more intoxicating cannabinoids, including, but not
limited to, delta-8 tetrahydrocannabinol, delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol,
tetrahydrocannabinol-O-acetate and tetrahydrocannabiphorol in concentrations in the
aggregate of 2.5 milligrams or greater per package, regardless of the number of servings,
except for beverages containing one or more intoxicating cannabinoids, including, but not
limited to, delta-8 tetrahydrocannabinol, delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol,
tetrahydrocannabinol-O-acetate and tetrahydrocannabiphorol in concentrations of 5
milligrams or less per 16 ounce or greater bottle or can to be sold only as an individual
bottle or can. The bill would prohibit the sale of intoxicating hemp products and beverages
containing one or more intoxicating cannabinoids, including, but not limited to, delta-8
tetrahydrocannabinol, delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol, tetrahydrocannabinol-O-acetate and
tetrahydrocannabiphorol in concentrations in the aggregate of 5 milligrams or less per 16
ounce or greater bottle or can to be sold as an individual bottle or can, to persons under 21
years of age and require that such products meet certain testing, packaging and labeling
standards to protect public health and safety.
The bill would remove the restriction on manufacturing hemp products contained in
the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 28-B, section 502, subsection 1-A and would expressly
authorize licensed adult use cannabis products manufacturing facilities to ship intoxicating
hemp products outside of the State for sale in other markets, subject to all other applicable
laws, including federal law, in the jurisdiction where those products are sold.
Page 1 - 132LR1973(01)